Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 98 Access to Advanced Placement Courses for All Students Act
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-98-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Access To Advanced Placement Courses For All Students Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 347, § 1.

16-98-2.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the following meanings given to them unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Advanced placement” means a college-level class taught at the high school level that provides students the opportunity to earn college credit upon passage of an exam that:

Incorporates all topics specified by the College Board on its standards syllabus for a given subject area; and

Is authorized by the College Board.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 4.]

“College Board” means and refers to the nonprofit organization that develops and administers standardized tests and curricula used by kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) and postsecondary education institutions to promote college readiness.

“Department” means the Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education.

“Eligible teacher” means a professional employee who is certified in the subject area of the advanced placement course that he or she will be teaching.

“Examination” or “exam” means the test provided by the College Board to measure a student’s mastery of the advanced placement subject matter.

“Four core academic areas” means advanced placement courses in English, mathematics, science, and social science.

“Poverty level” means students whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines.

“Program” means furtherance of the advanced placement classes in the public schools and includes teacher training and increased student participation.

“School district” means any public school district, school unit, area-vocational-technical school, charter school, or mayoral academy that composes a school district; the term also encompasses a single high school or multiple high schools within a school district where applicable.

“Teacher training entities” means institutions of higher education, intermediate units or organizations approved/certified by the College Board to train teachers to teach advanced placement courses.

“Virtual learning instruction” means providing academic courses to students via the Internet and/or the use of technology in providing instruction to students.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 4, effective July 6, 2021.

16-98-3.
Advanced placement teacher training program.

Purpose. The purpose of the advanced placement teacher training program is to provide access to advanced placement courses in the four (4) core academic subjects of English, mathematics, science and social science for all students by training teachers in advanced placement course instruction at all high schools that do not presently provide advanced placement courses.

Establishment. Subject to appropriation, the advanced placement teacher-training program shall be established in the department of education by the board of regents to train teachers in eligible school entities to teach advanced placement courses in the four (4) core academic areas of English, mathematics, science and social science in one or more of these disciplines.

Eligible school entities. Eligible school entities are those that do not have in each of their high schools at least one advanced placement course in the four (4) core academic areas.

A school district that has an advanced placement course in one or more of the four (4) core academic areas but not in all four (4) core academic areas is only eligible to have a teacher trained in those core academic areas that it does not have an advanced placement course.

No more than one teacher per core academic area in each high school of an eligible school district shall be trained under this program.

More than one eligible school district may apply jointly to the program to train a teacher in advanced placement course instruction if that teacher is to provide such instruction in more than one school district either through classroom instruction or through virtual learning instruction.

Application requirements for eligible school entities. The application by an eligible school district seeking funding for the program shall include the following:

The subject areas that currently have an advanced placement courses in each of its high schools;

The subject areas among the four (4) core academic areas that it does not have an advanced placement course in each of its high schools;

The names of the eligible teachers including the high school where they are teaching and the advanced placement academic subject area that each of the teachers will be providing instruction and whether the instruction will be in a classroom or through virtual learning instruction;

The names of the eligible teacher training entities that shall be providing the training for teachers in providing advanced placement instruction;

Agreement to provide the advanced placement course for high school students for at least three (3) years;

Guidelines the school district will use in determining which students may be eligible to enroll in an advanced placement course. The school district shall not discriminate on any basis in enrollment of students that is illegal under applicable federal or state law;

Agreement to annually report to the department for each of the four (4) core academic areas that were taught by teachers whose training was funded by this program the following information:

The number of students taking advanced placement courses;

The number of students who took the advanced placement examinations; and

The number of students scoring a three (3) or higher on the advanced placement examinations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 347, § 1.

16-98-4.
Powers and duties of department.

Guidelines. The department shall promulgate rules, regulations, and procedures necessary for the implementation of this chapter including, but not limited to, the following:

In consultation with the College Board, certify those teacher-training entities that are qualified to provide training of teachers to teach advanced placement courses in the four (4) core academic areas;

In certifying teacher-training entities for this program, the department shall ensure that the training times and locations will be geographically accessible for teachers from eligible school entities to attend;

The department, in consultation with the College Board, shall ensure that training provided by those teacher-training entities must provide teachers of advanced placement courses with the necessary content knowledge and instructional skills to prepare students for success in advanced placement courses and examinations;

Starting at the end of the first year of the program, and every year thereafter, the department shall issue a report to the general assembly on the advanced placement teacher-training program that shall include, but not be limited to:

The number of teachers receiving training in advanced placement instructions in school entities, school districts and high schools in each of the four (4) core academic areas.

The number of students taking advanced placement courses at school entities in each of the four (4) core academic areas.

The number of students scoring a three (3) or more on an advanced placement examination at school entities in each of the four (4) core academic areas.

The remaining unmet need for trained teachers in school entities that do not offer advanced placement courses.

The number of students taking advanced placement courses who do not take the advanced placement examination.

The number of students below the poverty level who take advanced placement courses.

The number of students below the poverty level who take advanced placement courses and do not take the advanced placement examination; and

In consultation with local education authorities, ensure that the opportunity to participate in the advanced placement program and gain college credit is available to the greatest number of students as practicable.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the board of education, through the department, from expanding the program to include other nationally accepted courses of study that provide students an opportunity to gain college credits from classes taken in high school.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 4, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 9, effective June 28, 2022.

16-98-5.
Funding to teacher training entities.

To the extent funds are appropriated for this program, the department shall provide grants per eligible teacher to the endorsed teacher training entities that provide training to teachers to teach advanced placement upon completion of the training program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 347, § 1.

16-98-6.
Program funding.

Funding shall be for the purpose of providing advanced placement examinations to students at or below the poverty level at no cost to the student.

Notwithstanding any general law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the department shall include as part of its annual budget the amount necessary to pay the exam costs for all students below the poverty level who take advanced placement courses.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 347, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 10, § 4, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 9, effective June 28, 2022.

16-98-7.
Availability of advanced placement courses.

Any school district offering advanced placement courses to students shall notify parents of their availability and the guidelines the school district uses in determining which students may be eligible to enroll in an advanced placement course.

Any school district offering advanced placement courses to students shall publish on the school district’s website the names of the advanced placement courses being offered to students and the guidelines the school district uses in determining which students may be eligible to enroll in an advanced placement course.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 347, § 1.